local/apertium-tr-az/apertium-tr-az.az.dix.xml
    <pardef n="pivə__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ni</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dac"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ye</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>de</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>den</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nin</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yle</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>m</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp1s"/><s n="abs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mi</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp1s"/><s n="dac"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mə</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp1s"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mdə</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp1s"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mdən</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp1s"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>min</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp1s"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mlə</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp1s"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp2s"/><s n="abs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ni</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp2s"/><s n="dac"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nə</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp2s"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ndə</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp2s"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ndən</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp2s"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nin</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp2s"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nlə</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp2s"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>si</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp3s"/><s n="abs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sini</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp3s"/><s n="dac"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sinə</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp3s"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sində</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp3s"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sindən</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp3s"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sinin</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp3s"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>siylə</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp3s"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>miz</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp1p"/><s n="abs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mizi</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp1p"/><s n="dac"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mizə</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp1p"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mizdə</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp1p"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mizdən</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp1p"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mizin</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp1p"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mizlə</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp1p"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>niz</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp2p"/><s n="abs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nizi</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp2p"/><s n="dac"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nizə</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp2p"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nizdə</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp2p"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nizdən</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp2p"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nizin</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp2p"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nizlə</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp2p"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>si</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp3p"/><s n="abs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sini</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp3p"/><s n="dac"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sinə</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp3p"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sində</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp3p"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pivesindən</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp3p"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sinin</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp3p"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>siyle</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp3p"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>si</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp3p"/><s n="abs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sini</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp3p"/><s n="dac"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sinə</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp3p"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sində</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp3p"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pivesindən</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp3p"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sinin</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp3p"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>siyle</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="pp3p"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lər</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ləri</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dac"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ləre</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lərdə</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lərdən</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lərin</l>

    <e lm="pivə"><i>pivə</i><par n="pivə__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vedrə"><i>vedrə</i><par n="pivə__n"/></e>
